test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IS_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kíl is - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IS_STEM_2

     kíl is+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kíl íija
     kíl is+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kíl íijang
     kíl is+V+DIRECT+PAST: kíl íijan
     kíl is+V+NON_FACTIVE: kíl íijang
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang
     kíl is+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijanggang
     kíl is+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl íijangang
     kíl is+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl íijiinii
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl íijaangaa
     kíl is+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl íijaangaan
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asa'áa
     kíl is+V+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asa'áang
     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaasdláa
     kíl is+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaasdláang
     kíl is+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kíl íij'ahlanggang
     kíl is+V+CERTAIN+PAST: kíl íij'ahlanggan
     kíl is+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kíl íij'ahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kíl íij'ahlans
     kíl is+V+REFLEXIVE: kíl íij'ahl
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang'waa
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang'waang
     kíl is+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl íijang'waa.ang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang'anggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl íijang'angang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaa'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kíl íijang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang'ang'waa
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kíl íijang'ang'waang
     kíl is+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kíl íijang'ang'waa.ang
